Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2404
Administrator
or nursing home administrator, defined.

Administrator
or nursing home administrator means any individual who meets the education
and training requirements of section 38-2419 and is responsible for planning,
organizing, directing, and controlling the operation of a nursing home or
an integrated system or who in fact performs such functions, whether or not
such functions are shared by one or more other persons. Notwithstanding this
section or any other provision of law, the administrator of an intermediate
care facility for persons
with developmental disabilities may be either a licensed nursing
home administrator or a qualified developmental
disabilities professional.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 819;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 7.